extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/opentaal_cpdpat2.aff
# Test file based on OpenTaal's Dutch dictionary, coded by Ruud Baars

WORDCHARS -
NOSPLITSUGS
FLAG long

COMPOUNDBEGIN Ca
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Cb
COMPOUNDEND Cc
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Cp
ONLYINCOMPOUND Cx

CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 2
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 0/Ch /Xs
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 0/Xm /Xm

SFX CA Y 2
SFX CA 0 /CaCp .
SFX CA 0 -/CaCp	.

SFX CB Y 2
SFX CB 0 /CbCp .
SFX CB 0 -/CbCp	.

SFX Ch Y 2
SFX Ch 0 s/CaCbCxCp .
SFX Ch 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .
